Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.100

Violations of chapter or rules—Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter may be subject to:

(1) A civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation; and/or

(2) Denial, revocation, or suspension of any registration or application for registration issued under this chapter. Upon notice by the director to deny, revoke, or suspend a registration or application for registration, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1998 c 154 s 30.]